Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 710 Y 48
SFX 710    0       on      .
SFX 710    0       etik      .
SFX 710    0       ek      .
SFX 710    0       dako      .
SFX 710    0       etarantz      .
SFX 710    0       era      .
SFX 710    0       i      .
SFX 710    0       ari      .
SFX 710    0       ez      .
SFX 710    0       en      .
SFX 710    0       aren      .
SFX 710    0       gandik      .
SFX 710    0       gatik      .
SFX 710    0       etako      .
SFX 710    0       ontzat      .
SFX 710    0       erat      .
SFX 710    0       ik      .
SFX 710    0       etatik      .
SFX 710    0       arentzat      .
SFX 710    0       arekin      .
SFX 710    0       a      .
SFX 710    0       entzat      .
SFX 710    0       gan      .
SFX 710    0       eko      .
SFX 710    0       etarik      .
SFX 710    0       etan      .
SFX 710    0       oi      .
SFX 710    0       gana      .
SFX 710    0       eraino      .
SFX 710    0       tzat      .
SFX 710    0       etarat      .
SFX 710    0       tzako      .
SFX 710    0       otaz      .
SFX 710    0       ganaino      .
SFX 710    0       ak      .
SFX 710    0       etara      .
SFX 710    0       ok      .
SFX 710    0       ekin      .
SFX 710    0       ean      .
SFX 710    0       etaraino      .
SFX 710    0       erantz      .
SFX 710    0       arendako      .
SFX 710    0       az      .
SFX 710    0       ei      .
SFX 710    0       ganantz      .
SFX 710    0       oz      .
SFX 710    0       endako      .
SFX 710    0       okin      .

SFX 711 Y 44
SFX 711    0       on      .
SFX 711    0       etik      .
SFX 711    0       ek      .
SFX 711    0       dako      .
SFX 711    0       etarantz      .
SFX 711    0       era      .
SFX 711    0       i      .
SFX 711    0       ari      .
SFX 711    0       ez      .
SFX 711    0       en      .
SFX 711    0       gandik      .
SFX 711    0       gatik      .
SFX 711    0       etako      .
SFX 711    0       ontzat      .
SFX 711    0       erat      .
SFX 711    0       ik      .
SFX 711    0       etatik      .
SFX 711    0       arentzat      .
SFX 711    0       a      .
SFX 711    0       entzat      .
SFX 711    0       gan      .
SFX 711    0       eko      .
SFX 711    0       etarik      .
SFX 711    0       etan      .
SFX 711    0       oi      .
SFX 711    0       gana      .
SFX 711    0       eraino      .
SFX 711    0       tzat      .
SFX 711    0       etarat      .
SFX 711    0       tzako      .
SFX 711    0       ganaino      .
SFX 711    0       ak      .
SFX 711    0       etara      .
SFX 711    0       ok      .
SFX 711    0       ekin      .
SFX 711    0       ean      .
SFX 711    0       etaraino      .
SFX 711    0       erantz      .
SFX 711    0       arendako      .
SFX 711    0       az      .
SFX 711    0       ei      .
SFX 711    0       ganantz      .
SFX 711    0       oz      .
SFX 711    0       endako      .

SFX 712 Y 43
SFX 712    0       on      .
SFX 712    0       etik      .
SFX 712    0       ek      .
SFX 712    0       dako      .
SFX 712    0       etarantz      .
SFX 712    0       era      .
SFX 712    0       i      .
SFX 712    0       ari      .
SFX 712    0       ez      .
SFX 712    0       gandik      .
SFX 712    0       gatik      .
SFX 712    0       etako      .
SFX 712    0       ontzat      .
SFX 712    0       erat      .
SFX 712    0       ik      .
SFX 712    0       etatik      .
SFX 712    0       arentzat      .
SFX 712    0       a      .
SFX 712    0       entzat      .
SFX 712    0       gan      .
SFX 712    0       eko      .
SFX 712    0       etarik      .
SFX 712    0       etan      .
SFX 712    0       oi      .
SFX 712    0       gana      .
SFX 712    0       eraino      .
SFX 712    0       tzat      .
SFX 712    0       etarat      .
SFX 712    0       tzako      .
SFX 712    0       ganaino      .
SFX 712    0       ak      .
SFX 712    0       etara      .
SFX 712    0       ok      .
SFX 712    0       ekin      .
SFX 712    0       ean      .
SFX 712    0       etaraino      .
SFX 712    0       erantz      .
SFX 712    0       arendako      .
SFX 712    0       az      .
SFX 712    0       ei      .
SFX 712    0       ganantz      .
SFX 712    0       oz      .
SFX 712    0       endako      .

SFX 713 Y 41
SFX 713    0       on      .
SFX 713    0       etik      .
SFX 713    0       ek      .
SFX 713    0       etarantz      .
SFX 713    0       era      .
SFX 713    0       etz      .
SFX 713    0       ari      .
SFX 713    0       ez      .
SFX 713    0       en      .
SFX 713    0       aren      .
SFX 713    0       etako      .
SFX 713    0       ontzat      .
SFX 713    0       erat      .
SFX 713    0       ik      .
SFX 713    0       txo      .
SFX 713    0       etatik      .
SFX 713    0       arentzat      .
SFX 713    0       arekin      .
SFX 713    0       a      .
SFX 713    0       entzat      .
SFX 713    0       eko      .
SFX 713    0       etarik      .
SFX 713    0       etan      .
SFX 713    0       oi      .
SFX 713    0       eraino      .
SFX 713    0       erako      .
SFX 713    0       etarat      .
SFX 713    0       otaz      .
SFX 713    0       ak      .
SFX 713    0       etara      .
SFX 713    0       ok      .
SFX 713    0       ekin      .
SFX 713    0       ean      .
SFX 713    0       etaraino      .
SFX 713    0       erantz      .
SFX 713    0       arendako      .
SFX 713    0       az      .
SFX 713    0       ei      .
SFX 713    0       oz      .
SFX 713    0       endako      .
SFX 713    0       okin      .

SFX 714 Y 42
SFX 714    0       on      .
SFX 714    0       etik      .
SFX 714    0       ek      .
SFX 714    0       etarantz      .
SFX 714    0       era      .
SFX 714    0       i      .
SFX 714    0       ari      .
SFX 714    0       ez      .
SFX 714    0       en      .
SFX 714    0       aren      .
SFX 714    0       gatik      .
SFX 714    0       etako      .
SFX 714    0       ontzat      .
SFX 714    0       erat      .
SFX 714    0       ik      .
SFX 714    0       etatik      .
SFX 714    0       go      .
SFX 714    0       arentzat      .
SFX 714    0       arekin      .
SFX 714    0       a      .
SFX 714    0       entzat      .
SFX 714    0       eko      .
SFX 714    0       etarik      .
SFX 714    0       etan      .
SFX 714    0       oi      .
SFX 714    0       eraino      .
SFX 714    0       tzat      .
SFX 714    0       etarat      .
SFX 714    0       otaz      .
SFX 714    0       ak      .
SFX 714    0       etara      .
SFX 714    0       ok      .
SFX 714    0       ekin      .
SFX 714    0       ean      .
SFX 714    0       etaraino      .
SFX 714    0       erantz      .
SFX 714    0       arendako      .
SFX 714    0       az      .
SFX 714    0       ei      .
SFX 714    0       oz      .
SFX 714    0       endako      .
SFX 714    0       okin      .
